North Carolina, session 2025, HB278.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 1 of Article 21A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 163-258.21. No photo ID required.
A covered voter voting under this Article shall not be required to include a photocopy of
identification described in G.S. 163-166.16(a) or an affidavit as described in
G.S. 163-166.16(d)(1), (d)(2), or (d)(3) when submitting a ballot in accordance with this Article."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to ballots cast on
or after that date.
*H278-v-1*